Wyoming, session 2025, HB0265.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. The Wyoming legislature finds that this
act, creating the Defend the Guard Act, follows the
principles embodied in the United States constitution and
the writings of the founders. Article I, section 8 of the
United States constitution vests in the congress the
exclusive power to declare war. By abdicating the war
powers to the executive branch, the United States congress
HB0265

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0357
has failed to follow the United States constitution and the
intent of the founders.

Section 2. W.S. 19-9-104 is created to read:

19-9-104. Defend the guard act.

(a) This section shall be known and may be cited as
the "Defend the Guard Act".

(b) For the purposes of this section:

(i) "Active duty combat" means performing the
following services in the active federal military service
of the United States:

(A) Participation in an armed conflict;

(B) Performance of a hazardous service
relating to an armed conflict in a foreign state; or

(C) Performance of a duty through an
instrumentality of war.
HB0265

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0357

(ii) "Official declaration of war" means an
official declaration of war made by the United States
congress pursuant to article I, section 8, clause 11 of the
United States constitution.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the
Wyoming national guard and any member thereof shall not be
released from the state into active duty combat unless the
United States congress has passed an official declaration
of war or has taken an official action pursuant to article
I, section 8, clause 15 of the United States constitution
to explicitly call forth the Wyoming national guard and any
member thereof for the enumerated purposes of expressly
executing the laws of the union, repelling invasion or
suppressing an insurrection. The governor shall take all
actions necessary to comply with the requirements of this
section.

(d) Nothing in this section limits or prohibits the
governor from consenting to the deployment of any Wyoming
national guard member under title 32 of the United States
Code for the purpose of providing defense support for civil
HB0265

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0357
authority missions within the United States and United
States territories.

Section 3. W.S. 19-9-204(b) is amended to read:

19-9-204. Command of military force called into
service.

(b) Subject to W.S. 19-9-104, the national guard of
the state may be ordered into the service of the United
States by the president of the United States for any
purpose for which he is authorized to use militia of the
states by the constitution of the United States.

Section 4. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0265